California, session 20252026, AB485.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 238.4 of the Labor Code is repealed.238.4.(a)If an employer in the long-term care industry that is also required to obtain a license from the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code, is found to be in violation of Section 238, the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services may deny a new license or the renewal of an existing license for that employer.(b)If the Labor Commissioner finds that an employer in the long-term care industry is conducting business in violation of Section 238, the Labor Commissioner shall notify the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services.(c)For purposes of this section “long-term care” means the operation of a skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, congregate living health facility, hospice facility, adult residential facility, residential care facility for persons with chronic life-threatening illness, residential care facility for the elderly, continuing care retirement community, home health agency, or home care organization, as those terms are used in Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 238.7 is added to the Labor Code, to read:238.7. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if an employer in an industry that is also required to obtain a license or permit from any state agency is found to have violated Section 238, the applicable state agency shall deny a new license or permit, or the renewal of an existing license or permit, for that employer.(b) If the Labor Commissioner finds that an employer is conducting business in violation of Section 238, the Labor Commissioner shall notify the applicable state agency with jurisdiction over that employer’s license or permit.(c) The State Public Health Officer may exempt a hospital employer from the requirements of this section upon a determination that a denial, suspension, or revocation of the hospital’s license, permit, or renewal could have imminent or substantial adverse effects upon public health or safety or would violate constitutional law.(c)(d) For purposes of this section, “state agency” means any agency, department, division, commission, board, bureau, officer, or other authority of the State of California. shall have the meaning prescribed by Section 11000 of the Government Code.